New Jersey, session 222, S693.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1977, c.202 (C.39:4-197.5) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  [Any] A municipality may, by ordinance, resolution, or regulation, establish restricted parking spaces in front of residences, schools, hospitals and other public buildings and in shopping and business districts for use by persons who have been issued special vehicle identification cards by the Division of Motor Vehicles pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-205), when using a motor vehicle on which is displayed a certificate, for which a special vehicle identification card has been issued, pursuant to section 3 of [said law] P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-206). b.    (1)  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, and consistent with federal law, a municipality shall not require approval of a minor site plan or site plan, as defined in sections 3.2 and 3.4 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-5 and C.40:55D-7), respectively, or any other approval required by an approving authority or enforcing agency pursuant to P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.) or P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.), that is solely for an improvement to an existing parking lot or parking structure within a commercial zone to provide up to five van accessible parking spaces that meet the criteria established by chapter five of the 2010 ADA Standards for Accessible Design, or its successor. (2)   For the purposes of this subsection: 2010 ADA Standards for Accessible Design means the 2010 ADA Standards for Accessible Design published by the United States Department of Justice on September 15, 2010; Van accessible means an accessible parking space that is wide enough to accommodate a wheelchair lift or ramp, has higher vertical clearance specifications, and requires a sign identifying the space as van accessible. (cf: P.L.1980, c.178, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.